New Jersey, session 222, A5079.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    The provisions of any law, rule, regulation, or order to the contrary notwithstanding, each electric, gas, and water public utility, as defined in R.S.48:2-13, that provides service to a facility operated by a volunteer fire company, by a first aid, rescue, or emergency squad, or by a nonprofit homeless or domestic violence assistance organization, shall allow a credit against total charges in each billing period for the electric, gas, or water public utilitys distribution service, as appropriate, to that facility.  The amount of the bill credit shall be a percentage of the amount of the distribution service charge as shall be established by the Board of Public Utilities. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately, but shall remain inoperative for 60 days following the date of enactment.